Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 2. School Building Construction or Repair

§ 3581.
Acceptance.

The State Board may accept, use, disburse, and account for federal funds made available for the purposes of acquisition, construction, reconstruction, remodeling, or repair of public school buildings.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 223, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 3582.
Formulation of plans.

The State Board may formulate any State plan, including preparation of surveys and estimates of school building needs, required by federal legislation.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 224, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 3583.
Control by federal authority prohibited.

No supervision or control may be exercised under the provisions of this subchapter by any federal authority over the administration, personnel, curriculum, instruction, methods of instruction, or materials of instruction in any Vermont public school.